Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-673
Construction and operation; contracts; procedures.

The mayor and city council of any city of the first class shall have power to make contracts with and authorize any person, company, or association to erect a gas works, power plant, electric or other light works, heating plant, or waterworks in such city and give such persons, company, or association the privilege of furnishing water, lights, power, or heat for the streets, lanes, alleys, and public places and property of such city and its inhabitants for any length of time not exceeding twenty-five years. Any city of the first class may by resolution of the city council contract for the furnishing of electricity at retail to such city and the inhabitants thereof with any public power district, or an electric cooperative which cooperative has an approved retail service area adjoining such city's retail service area.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 54, p. 272;

Laws 1905, c. 23, § 2, p. 244;

Laws 1907, c. 14, § 1, p. 121;

Laws 1909, c. 19, § 1, p. 184;

R.S.1913, § 4954;

Laws 1917, c. 97, § 1, p. 260;

Laws 1919, c. 38, § 1, p. 120;

Laws 1921, c. 169, § 1, p. 661;

C.S.1922, § 4123;

C.S.1929, § 16-652;

Laws 1931, c. 29, § 1, p. 118;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-652;

R.S.1943, § 16-673;

Laws 1951, c. 26, § 2, p. 118;

Laws 1965, c. 58, § 1, p. 266;

Laws 1969, c. 83, § 1, p. 418;

Laws 1975, LB 67, § 1.

Contract with private corporation to supply water to supplement city waterworks system authorized. Hevelone v. City of Beatrice, 120 Neb. 648, 234 N.W. 791 (1931).

Power company that contracted with village, to furnish electric power at a given rate for twenty-five years, is estopped, after operating thereunder for six years, to claim the contract was ultra vires and confiscatory. Village of Davenport v. Meyer Hydro-Electric Power Co., 110 Neb. 367, 193 N.W. 719 (1923).

Under prior act, city's authority to grant a franchise to a gas company was not restricted to such works being built within such city nor need its franchise be limited to a period of five years. Sharp v. City of South Omaha, 53 Neb. 700, 74 N.W. 76 (1898).

City cannot make a contract precluding it from increasing or decreasing the rates for electric power during the life of the contract, but such city cannot make rates that are noncompensatory or confiscatory. Central Power Co. v. City of Kearney, 274 F. 253 (8th Cir. 1921).

Authority granted city to contract to build and operate a waterworks "on such terms and under such regulations as may be agreed on" constitutes authority to agree with water company on water rates for twenty-five years, and city's attempt to alter such rates may be enjoined. Omaha Water Co. v. City of Omaha, 147 F. 1 (8th Cir. 1906).

City is estopped to defend against waterworks bonds in hands of innocent purchasers where such bonds reflect city certified in bond that they were legally issued, it having plenary power so to do, though the bonds cited the wrong statutory section as authority therefor. City of Beatrice v. Edminson, 117 F. 427 (8th Cir. 1902).